Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325M.40] GEOLOCATION DATA; USE; LIMITATIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Collect" means buying, renting, gathering, obtaining, receiving, accessing, or otherwise acquiring personal data by any means. new text end new text begin (c) "Consumer" means an individual who is a resident of Minnesota. Consumer does not include an individual acting: (1) in a commercial or employment context; or (2) as an employee, owner, director, officer, or contractor of a company, partnership, sole proprietorship, nonprofit entity, or government agency whose communications or transactions with the controller occur solely within the context of the individual's role with the company, partnership, sole proprietorship, nonprofit entity, or government agency. new text end new text begin (d) "Controller" has the meaning given in section 325M.11, paragraph (h). new text end new text begin (e) "Device" means a physical object that is capable of directly or indirectly connecting to the Internet or another device. new text end new text begin (f) "Personal data" has the meaning given in section 325M.11, paragraph (p). new text end new text begin (g) "Precise geolocation data" means information derived from technology, including but not limited to latitude and longitude coordinates from global positioning system mechanisms or other similar positional data, that reveals with precision and accuracy within a radius of 1,750 feet the past or present physical location of (1) an individual, or (2) a device that identifies, is linked, or is reasonably linkable to one or more individuals. Precise geolocation data does not include the content of a communication, photograph, or video unless the content is used to identify an individual's or device's precise geolocation. new text end new text begin (h) "Process" or "processing" has the meaning given in section 325M.11, paragraph (q). new text end new text begin (i) "Processor" means a person who collects, processes, or transfers personal data on behalf and at the direction of a controller or another processor. new text end new text begin (j) "Sale of personal data" has the meaning given in section 325M.11, paragraph (u). new text end new text begin (k) "Third party" means a person that collects personal data from another person who is not (1) the consumer to whom the data pertains, or (2) a processor with respect to the data. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Consumer protections. new text end new text begin (a) A controller that collects a consumer's precise geolocation data must, in the controller's publicly accessible privacy notice, inform the consumer that the consumer's precise geolocation data is being collected. The privacy notice must also include: new text end new text begin (1) the type of precise geolocation data collected, including the data's precision level; new text end new text begin (2) the goods or services the consumer requested that are the basis for the controller to collect, process, or disclose the consumer's precise geolocation data, including a description of how the controller processes the precise geolocation data for the purposes indicated in this clause; new text end new text begin (3) whether the controller is collecting, processing, or disclosing precise geolocation data to prevent or respond to security incidents, fraud, harassment, malicious or deceptive activities, or illegal activity, including a description of how the controller processes the precise geolocation data for the purposes indicated in this clause; and new text end new text begin (4) disclosures describing the precise geolocation data necessary to provide the goods or services requested by the consumer, including the identity of each third party to whom the precise geolocation data is disclosed. new text end new text begin (b) In addition to providing notice under paragraph (a), a controller that collects a consumer's precise geolocation data must prominently display a notice that informs the consumer that the consumer's precise geolocation data is being collected. The notice must be provided to the consumer at the time or before collection occurs. new text end new text begin (c) A controller or processor is prohibited from: new text end new text begin (1) collecting or processing more precise geolocation data than is necessary to provide the goods or services requested by the consumer; new text end new text begin (2) retaining precise geolocation data for more time than is necessary to provide the goods or services requested by the consumer or more than one year after the date the consumer last intentionally interacted with the controller, whichever occurs first; or new text end new text begin (3) selling, trading, or leasing precise geolocation data to a third party. new text end new text begin (d) Notwithstanding paragraph (c), a controller or processor may collect or process precise geolocation data that is necessary to: (1) prevent or respond to security incidents, fraud, harassment, malicious or deceptive activities, or illegal activity targeted at the consumer; or (2) enable the controller or processor to investigate, report, or prosecute a person responsible for an action identified in clause (1). A controller or processor is prohibited from retaining precise location information collected and processed under this subdivision for more than 90 days, except as required under law. A controller or processor is prohibited from using precise location information collected and processed under this subdivision for any other purpose. new text end new text begin (e) Notwithstanding paragraph (c), a controller or processor may use precise geolocation data to perform services on behalf of the controller or processor, including maintaining or servicing accounts, providing customer service, processing or fulfilling orders and transactions, verifying customer information, processing payments, providing financing, providing storage, or providing similar services on behalf of the controller or processor. A controller or processor is prohibited from using precise location information collected and processed under this subdivision for any other purpose. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin A consumer injured by a violation of subdivision 2 may bring a civil action against the party that commits the violation. In a civil action brought under this subdivision, the court may award the injured consumer one or more of the following: new text end new text begin (1) damages in an amount not less than $5,000 per individual per violation, as adjusted annually to reflect an increase in the Consumer Price Index, or actual damages, whichever is greater; new text end new text begin (2) punitive damages; new text end new text begin (3) injunctive relief, including an order that an entity retrieved personal data transferred in violation of this section; new text end new text begin (4) declaratory relief; or new text end new text begin (5) reasonable attorney fees and litigation costs. new text end